Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of justice for the fiscal year beginning July 5 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 6 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 7 designated: 8 a. For the general office of attorney general for 9 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, 10 including the prosecuting attorneys training program, matching 11 funds for federal violence against women grant programs, 12 victim assistance grants, the office of drug control policy 13 prosecuting attorney program, and odometer fraud enforcement: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,312,267 15 As a condition of receiving the appropriation provided 16 in this lettered paragraph, the department of justice shall 17 maintain a record of the estimated time incurred representing 18 each agency or department. 19 The general office of attorney general may temporarily 20 exceed and draw more than the amount appropriated in this 21 lettered paragraph and incur a negative cash balance as long 22 as there are receivables equal to or greater than the negative 23 balances and the amount appropriated in this lettered paragraph 24 is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal year. 25 b. For victim assistance grants: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,016,708 27 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be 28 used to provide grants to care providers providing services to 29 crime victims of human trafficking, domestic abuse, rape, or 30 sexual assault. 31 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 32 $1,000,000 is allocated exclusively for the benefit of human 33 trafficking victims to enable them to travel to and from court 34 proceedings and provide them with services such as mental 35 -1- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 1/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ health counseling. In addition, the moneys are allocated to 1 help human trafficking victims who are also victims of abuse or 2 domestic violence with home relocation and security expenses, 3 reimbursement for lost wages, and child care necessary to 4 appear in court. 5 The balance of the victim compensation fund established in 6 section 915.94 may be used to provide salary and support and 7 to provide maintenance for the victim compensation functions 8 of the department of justice. In addition to any full-time 9 equivalent positions otherwise authorized, 7.00 full-time 10 equivalent positions are authorized and shall be used by the 11 department of justice to employ one accountant and four program 12 planners. The department of justice may employ the additional 13 7.00 full-time equivalent positions authorized pursuant to 14 this unnumbered paragraph that are in excess of the number 15 of full-time equivalent positions authorized only if the 16 department of justice receives sufficient federal moneys to 17 maintain employment for the additional full-time equivalent 18 positions during the current fiscal year. The department 19 of justice shall only employ the additional 7.00 full-time 20 equivalent positions in succeeding fiscal years if sufficient 21 federal moneys are received during each of those succeeding 22 fiscal years. 23 The department of justice shall transfer at least $150,000 24 from the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 25 to the victim assistance grant program established in section 26 13.31. 27 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 28 lettered paragraph that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 29 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 30 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 31 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 32 c. For legal services for persons in poverty grants as 33 provided in section 13.34: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,634,601 35 -2- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 2/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ d. To improve the department of justiceâs cybersecurity and 1 technology infrastructure: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 202,060 3 2. a. The department of justice, in submitting budget 4 estimates for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, pursuant 5 to section 8.23, shall include a report of funding from sources 6 other than amounts appropriated directly from the general fund 7 of the state to the department of justice or to the office of 8 consumer advocate. These funding sources shall include but 9 are not limited to reimbursements from other state agencies, 10 commissions, boards, or similar entities, and reimbursements 11 from special funds or internal accounts within the department 12 of justice. The department of justice shall also report actual 13 reimbursements for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, 14 and actual and expected reimbursements for the fiscal year 15 beginning July 1, 2025. 16 b. The department of justice shall include the report 17 required under paragraph âaâ, as well as information regarding 18 any revisions occurring as a result of reimbursements actually 19 received or expected at a later date, in a report to the 20 general assembly. The department of justice shall submit the 21 report on or before January 15, 2026. 22 3. a. The department of justice shall fully reimburse 23 the costs and necessary related expenses incurred by the Iowa 24 law enforcement academy to continue to employ one additional 25 instructor position who shall provide training for human 26 trafficking-related issues throughout the state. 27 b. The department of justice shall obtain the moneys 28 necessary to reimburse the Iowa law enforcement academy to 29 employ such an instructor from unrestricted moneys from either 30 the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 or 31 the human trafficking victim fund established in section 915.95 32 or the human trafficking enforcement fund established in 2015 33 Iowa Acts, chapter 138, section 141. 34 Sec. 2. OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE. There is appropriated 35 -3- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 3/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ from the commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to 1 the office of consumer advocate of the department of justice 2 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 3 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 4 to be used for the purposes designated: 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,763,937 8 The office of consumer advocate shall include in its charges 9 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 10 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 11 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 12 services. 13 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ FACILITIES. 14 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 15 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 16 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, 17 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 18 designated: 19 a. For the operation of the Fort Madison correctional 20 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 21 miscellaneous purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 46,577,646 23 b. For the operation of the Anamosa correctional facility, 24 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 25 purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 39,401,446 27 c. For the operation of the Oakdale correctional facility, 28 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 59,081,235 31 d. For the Oakdale correctional facility for 32 department-wide institutional pharmaceuticals and miscellaneous 33 purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,425,417 35 -4- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 4/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ e. For the operation of the Newton correctional facility, 1 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 32,349,917 4 f. For the operation of the Mount Pleasant correctional 5 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 6 miscellaneous purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,357,365 8 g. For the operation of the Rockwell City correctional 9 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 10 miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,726,196 12 h. For the operation of the Clarinda correctional facility, 13 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 29,268,191 16 i. For the operation of the Mitchellville correctional 17 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 18 miscellaneous purposes: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,097,515 20 j. For the operation of the Fort Dodge correctional 21 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 22 miscellaneous purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,147,756 24 k. For reimbursement of counties for temporary confinement 25 of prisoners, as provided in sections 901.7, 904.908, and 26 906.17, and for offenders confined pursuant to section 904.513: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,345,319 28 l. For federal prison reimbursement, reimbursements for 29 out-of-state placements, and miscellaneous contracts: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 234,411 31 2. The department of corrections shall use moneys 32 appropriated in subsection 1 to continue to contract for the 33 services of a Muslim imam and a Native American spiritual 34 leader. 35 -5- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 5/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ ADMINISTRATION. 1 There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 2 department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning July 3 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 4 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 1. For general administration, including salaries and the 7 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, support, 8 maintenance, employment of an education director to administer 9 a centralized education program for the correctional system, 10 and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,469,093 12 a. It is the intent of the general assembly that each 13 lease negotiated by the department of corrections with a 14 private corporation for the purpose of providing private 15 industry employment of inmates in a correctional institution 16 shall prohibit the private corporation from utilizing inmate 17 labor for partisan political purposes for any person seeking 18 election to public office in this state and that a violation 19 of this requirement shall result in a termination of the lease 20 agreement. 21 b. It is the intent of the general assembly that as a 22 condition of receiving the appropriation provided in this 23 subsection the department of corrections shall not enter into 24 a lease or contractual agreement pursuant to section 904.809 25 with a private corporation for the use of building space for 26 the purpose of providing inmate employment without providing 27 that the terms of the lease or contract establish safeguards to 28 restrict, to the greatest extent feasible, access by inmates 29 working for the private corporation to personal identifying 30 information of citizens. 31 2. For educational programs for inmates at state penal 32 institutions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,108,109 34 a. To maximize the funding for educational programs, 35 -6- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 6/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the department shall establish guidelines and procedures to 1 prioritize the availability of educational and vocational 2 training for inmates based upon the goal of facilitating an 3 inmateâs successful release from the correctional institution. 4 b. The director of the department of corrections may 5 transfer moneys from Iowa prison industries and the canteen 6 operating funds established pursuant to section 904.310, for 7 use in educational programs for inmates. 8 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 9 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 10 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 11 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in this 12 subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 13 3. For the development and operation of the Iowa corrections 14 offender network (ICON) data system: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 16 4. For offender mental health and substance abuse 17 treatment: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 28,065 19 5. For department-wide duties, including operations, costs, 20 and miscellaneous purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,905,778 22 Sec. 5. JUDICIAL DISTRICT DEPARTMENTS OF CORRECTIONAL 23 SERVICES. 24 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 25 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 26 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for salaries, support, 27 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, the following amounts, 28 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 29 designated: 30 a. For the first judicial district department of 31 correctional services: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,301,981 33 It is the intent of the general assembly that the first 34 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 35 -7- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 7/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the drug courts operated by the district department. 1 b. For the second judicial district department of 2 correctional services: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,230,459 4 It is the intent of the general assembly that the second 5 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 6 two drug courts to be operated by the district department. 7 c. For the third judicial district department of 8 correctional services: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,915,522 10 d. For the fourth judicial district department of 11 correctional services: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,465,898 13 e. For the fifth judicial district department of 14 correctional services, including funding for electronic 15 monitoring devices for use on a statewide basis: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,026,927 17 It is the intent of the general assembly that the fifth 18 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 19 the drug court operated by the district department. 20 f. For the sixth judicial district department of 21 correctional services: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,690,992 23 It is the intent of the general assembly that the sixth 24 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 25 the drug court operated by the district department. 26 g. For the seventh judicial district department of 27 correctional services: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,013,381 29 It is the intent of the general assembly that the seventh 30 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 31 the drug court operated by the district department. 32 h. For the eighth judicial district department of 33 correctional services: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,241,148 35 -8- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 8/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. Each judicial district department of correctional 1 services, within the moneys available, shall continue programs 2 and plans established within that district to provide for 3 intensive supervision, sex offender treatment, diversion of 4 low-risk offenders to the least restrictive sanction available, 5 job development, and expanded use of intermediate criminal 6 sanctions. 7 3. Each judicial district department of correctional 8 services shall provide alternatives to prison consistent with 9 chapter 901B. The alternatives to prison shall ensure public 10 safety while providing maximum rehabilitation to the offender. 11 A judicial district department of correctional services may 12 also establish a day program. 13 4. The office of drug control policy of the department 14 of public safety shall consider federal grants made to the 15 department of corrections for the benefit of each of the eight 16 judicial district departments of correctional services as local 17 government grants, as defined pursuant to federal regulations. 18 5. The department of corrections shall continue to contract 19 with a judicial district department of correctional services to 20 provide for the rental of electronic monitoring equipment which 21 shall be available statewide. 22 6. The public safety assessment shall not be utilized in 23 pretrial hearings when determining whether to detain or release 24 a defendant before trial until such time the use of the public 25 safety assessment has been specifically authorized by the 26 general assembly. 27 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ REALLOCATION OF 28 APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding section 8.39, within the 29 moneys appropriated in this division of this Act to the 30 department of corrections, the department may reallocate the 31 moneys appropriated and allocated as necessary to best fulfill 32 the needs of the correctional institutions, administration 33 of the department, and the judicial district departments of 34 correctional services. However, in addition to complying with 35 -9- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 9/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the requirements of section 904.116 and providing notice to 1 the legislative services agency, the department of corrections 2 shall also provide notice to the department of management, 3 prior to the effective date of the revision or reallocation of 4 an appropriation made pursuant to this section. The department 5 of corrections shall not reallocate an appropriation or 6 allocation for the purpose of eliminating any program. 7 Sec. 7. INTENT ââ REPORTS. 8 1. The department of corrections, in cooperation with 9 townships, the Iowa cemetery associations, and other nonprofit 10 or governmental entities, may use inmate labor during the 11 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, to restore or preserve 12 rural cemeteries and historical landmarks. The department, in 13 cooperation with the counties, may also use inmate labor to 14 clean up roads, major water sources, and other water sources 15 around the state. 16 2. By January 15, 2026, the department shall provide an 17 annual status report regarding private-sector employment to 18 the general assembly. The report shall include the number 19 of offenders employed in the private sector, the combined 20 number of hours worked by the offenders, the total amount of 21 allowances, and the distribution of allowances pursuant to 22 section 904.702, including any moneys deposited in the general 23 fund of the state. 24 Sec. 8. ELECTRONIC MONITORING REPORT. The department of 25 corrections shall submit a report on electronic monitoring 26 to the general assembly by January 15, 2026. The report 27 shall specifically address the number of persons being 28 electronically monitored and break down the number of persons 29 being electronically monitored by offense committed. The 30 report shall also include a comparison of any data from the 31 prior fiscal year with the current fiscal year. 32 Sec. 9. STATE AGENCY PURCHASES FROM PRISON INDUSTRIES. 33 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 34 requires, âstate agencyâ means the government of the state 35 -10- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 10/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ of Iowa, including but not limited to all executive branch 1 departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, and commissions, the 2 judicial branch, the general assembly and all legislative 3 agencies, institutions within the purview of the state board of 4 regents, and any corporation whose primary function is to act 5 as an instrumentality of the state. 6 2. State agencies are encouraged to purchase products from 7 Iowa state industries, as defined in section 904.802, when 8 purchases are required and the products are available from 9 Iowa state industries. State agencies shall obtain bids from 10 Iowa state industries for purchases of office furniture during 11 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, exceeding $5,000 or 12 in accordance with applicable administrative rules related to 13 purchases for the agency. 14 Sec. 10. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY. 15 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 16 state to the Iowa law enforcement academy for the fiscal year 17 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 18 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 19 purposes designated: 20 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes, including jailer training and technical assistance: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,968,138 23 b. The Iowa law enforcement academy may temporarily exceed 24 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection 25 and incur a negative cash balance as long as there are 26 receivables equal to or greater than the negative balance and 27 the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded at 28 the close of the fiscal year. 29 2. The Iowa law enforcement academy may select at least 30 five automobiles of the department of public safety, division 31 of state patrol, prior to turning over the automobiles to 32 the department of administrative services to be disposed 33 of by public auction, and the Iowa law enforcement academy 34 may exchange any automobile owned by the academy for each 35 -11- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 11/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ automobile selected if the selected automobile is used in 1 training law enforcement officers at the academy. However, any 2 automobile exchanged by the academy shall be substituted for 3 the selected vehicle of the department of public safety and 4 sold by public auction with the receipts being deposited in the 5 depreciation fund maintained pursuant to section 8A.365 to the 6 credit of the department of public safety, division of state 7 patrol. 8 3. The Iowa law enforcement academy shall provide training 9 for domestic abuse and human trafficking-related issues 10 throughout the state. The training shall be offered at no 11 cost to the attendees and the training shall not replace any 12 existing domestic abuse or human trafficking training offered 13 by the academy. 14 Sec. 11. STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER. 15 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 16 to the office of the state public defender of the department 17 of inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 18 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 19 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 20 purposes designated: 21 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,515,363 24 b. For payments on behalf of eligible adults and juveniles 25 from the indigent defense fund, in accordance with section 26 815.11: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,106,374 28 2. Moneys received by the office of the state public 29 defender pursuant to Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security 30 Act remaining unencumbered and unobligated at the end of the 31 fiscal year shall not revert but shall be transferred to the 32 Tit. IV-E juvenile justice improvement fund created in 2022 33 Iowa Acts, chapter 1146, section 11, subsection 3, to remain 34 available for expenditure by the office of the state public 35 -12- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 12/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ defender in succeeding fiscal years for the purposes allowed by 1 Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security Act. 2 Sec. 12. BOARD OF PAROLE. There is appropriated from the 3 general fund of the state to the board of parole for the fiscal 4 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 5 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 6 used for the purposes designated: 7 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 8 purposes: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,565,782 10 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE. 11 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 12 state to the department of public defense, for the fiscal year 13 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 14 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 15 purposes designated: 16 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,389,691 19 2. The department of public defense may temporarily exceed 20 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this section and 21 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 22 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 23 and the amount appropriated in this section is not exceeded at 24 the close of the fiscal year. 25 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 26 MANAGEMENT. 27 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 28 to the department of homeland security and emergency management 29 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 30 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 31 to be used for the purposes designated: 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,446,138 35 -13- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 13/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. The department of homeland security and emergency 1 management may temporarily exceed and draw more than the amount 2 appropriated in this section and incur a negative cash balance 3 as long as there are receivables of federal funds equal to or 4 greater than the negative balance and the amount appropriated 5 in this section is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal 6 year. 7 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. There is appropriated 8 from the general fund of the state to the department of public 9 safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 10 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 11 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 12 1. For administrative functions, including salaries and the 13 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, the criminal 14 justice information system: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,195,906 16 2. For the division of criminal investigation, including 17 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 18 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 19 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 20 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 21 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 22,805,958 23 3. For the criminalistics laboratory fund created in 24 section 691.9: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 26 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 27 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 28 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 29 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 30 the succeeding fiscal year. 31 4. a. For the division of narcotics enforcement, including 32 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 33 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 34 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 35 -14- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 14/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 1 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,265,032 3 b. For the division of narcotics enforcement for undercover 4 purchases: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 209,042 6 5. For the division of state fire marshal, for fire 7 protection services as provided through the state fire service 8 and emergency response council as created in the department, 9 and for the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ 10 retirement, accident, and disability system provided in chapter 11 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as 12 defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which 13 the moneys are appropriated: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,554,935 15 6. For the division of state patrol, for salaries, support, 16 maintenance, workersâ compensation costs, and miscellaneous 17 purposes, including the stateâs contribution to the peace 18 officersâ retirement, accident, and disability system provided 19 in chapter 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution 20 rate, as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries 21 for which the moneys are appropriated: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92,232,969 23 It is the intent of the general assembly that members of the 24 state patrol be assigned to patrol the highways and roads in 25 lieu of assignments for inspecting school buses for the school 26 districts. 27 7. For deposit in the sick leave benefits fund established 28 in section 80.42 for all departmental employees eligible to 29 receive benefits for accrued sick leave under the collective 30 bargaining agreement: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 279,517 32 8. For costs associated with the training and equipment 33 needs of volunteer fire fighters: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,075,520 35 -15- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 15/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 1 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 2 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 3 for expenditure for the purposes designated in this subsection 4 until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 5 9. For the public safety interoperable and broadband 6 communications fund established in section 80.44: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,661 8 10. For the office to combat human trafficking established 9 pursuant to section 80.45, including salaries, support, 10 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,742 12 11. For department-wide duties, including operations, 13 costs, and miscellaneous purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,944,668 15 12. For deposit in the public safety equipment fund 16 established in section 80.48 for the purchase, maintenance, and 17 replacement of equipment used by the department: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,750,000 19 13. For the office of drug control policy, for salaries, 20 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, including 21 statewide coordination of the drug abuse resistance education 22 (D.A.R.E) programs or other similar programs: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 261,064 24 Notwithstanding section 8.39, the department of public 25 safety may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 26 as necessary to best fulfill the needs provided for in the 27 appropriation. However, the department shall not reallocate 28 moneys appropriated to the department in this section unless 29 notice of the reallocation is given to the legislative services 30 agency and the department of management prior to the effective 31 date of the reallocation. The notice shall include information 32 regarding the rationale for reallocating the moneys. The 33 department shall not reallocate moneys appropriated in this 34 section for the purpose of eliminating any program. 35 -16- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 16/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 16. GAMING ENFORCEMENT. 1 1. There is appropriated from the gaming enforcement 2 revolving fund created in section 80.43 to the department of 3 public safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 4 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 5 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 6 For any direct support costs for agents and officers of 7 the division of criminal investigationâs excursion gambling 8 boat, gambling structure, and racetrack enclosure enforcement 9 activities, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 10 miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,227,940 12 2. For each additional license to conduct gambling games on 13 an excursion gambling boat, gambling structure, or racetrack 14 enclosure issued during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 15 there is appropriated from the gaming enforcement revolving 16 fund to the department of public safety for the fiscal year 17 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, an additional 18 amount of not more than $300,000 to be used for full-time 19 equivalent positions. 20 3. The department of public safety, with the approval of the 21 department of management, may employ no more than three special 22 agents for each additional riverboat or gambling structure 23 regulated after July 1, 2026, and three special agents for each 24 racing facility which becomes operational during the fiscal 25 year which begins July 1, 2026. 26 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 27 MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated from the 911 emergency 28 communications fund created in section 34A.7A to the department 29 of homeland security and emergency management for the fiscal 30 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 31 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 32 used for the purposes designated: 33 For implementation, support, and maintenance of the 34 functions of the administrator and program manager under 35 -17- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 17/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ chapter 34A and to employ the auditor of the state to perform 1 an annual audit of the 911 emergency communications fund: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 3 Sec. 18. CONSUMER EDUCATION AND LITIGATION ââ FARM 4 MEDIATION AND PROSECUTIONS, APPEALS, AND CLAIMS. 5 Notwithstanding section 714.16C , there is appropriated from the 6 consumer education and litigation fund to the department of 7 justice for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 8 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 9 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 10 1. For farm mediation services as specified in section 11 13.13, subsection 2 : 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 13 2. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes for criminal prosecutions, criminal appeals, and 15 performing duties pursuant to chapter 669 : 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 17 DIVISION II 18 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ CAPITAL REINVESTMENT FUND 19 Sec. 19. Section 904.317, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 20 amended to read as follows: 21 1. The director, subject to the approval of the board, may 22 secure options to purchase real estate and acquire and sell 23 real estate for the proper uses of the institutions. Real 24 estate shall be acquired and sold upon terms and conditions the 25 director recommends subject to the approval of the board. Upon 26 sale of the real estate, the proceeds shall be deposited in a 27 corrections capital reinvestment fund, which is established in 28 the state treasury under the purview of the department. There 29 is appropriated from the fund to the department the proceeds, 30 which may be used to purchase other real estate , or for capital 31 improvements upon property under the directorâs supervision , or 32 for upgrades to the Iowa corrections offender network system . 33 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund that remain 34 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 35 -18- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 18/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 1 purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 3 to the fund. 4 DIVISION III 5 ATTORNEY GENERAL ââ CONSUMER EDUCATION AND LITIGATION FUND 6 Sec. 20. 2014 Iowa Acts, chapter 1138, section 21, as 7 amended by 2016 Iowa Acts, chapter 1137, section 18, 2017 Iowa 8 Acts, chapter 167, section 24, 2019 Iowa Acts, chapter 163, 9 section 26, 2021 Iowa Acts, chapter 166, section 23, and 2023 10 Iowa Acts, chapter 113, section 22, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 SEC. 21. CONSUMER EDUCATION AND LITIGATION 13 FUND. Notwithstanding section 714.16C , for each fiscal 14 year of the period beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 15 30, 2025 2027 , the annual appropriations in section 714.16C , 16 are increased from $1,125,000 to $1,875,000, and $75,000 to 17 $125,000 , respectively. 18 DIVISION IV 19 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ FEDERAL RECEIPTS FUND 20 Sec. 21. NEW SECTION . 904.118 Federal receipts fund. 21 1. A federal receipts fund is established in the state 22 treasury under the control of the department. The fund shall 23 consist of all of the following: 24 a. All federal moneys received by the department, including 25 but not limited to moneys received for federally contracted 26 services, but excluding moneys required to be deposited in the 27 special fund pursuant to section 8.41. 28 b. Any other moneys appropriated to or deposited in the 29 fund. 30 2. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 31 for purposes of the operations of the department and any other 32 use authorized or required under the federal law or contract 33 pursuant to which the moneys were paid. This subsection 34 does not apply to federal moneys the expenditure of which is 35 -19- LSB 1014XG (13) 91 as/ns 19/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ otherwise provided for by law, including but not limited to 1 federal moneys described in section 904.301B, subsection 14. 2 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 3 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a 4 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 5 expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding 6 section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in 7 the fund shall be credited to the fund. 8 Sec. 22. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 9 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10 Sec. 23. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 11 Act applies retroactively to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 12 2023. 13